Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:(1) On or before January 1, 2027, hospitals licensed under this chapter must have at least one person who is physically present every day in the acute care setting who may assist patients to navigate the health care system on behalf of the patient. Patient advocacy services and duties outlined in subsection (4) of this section may be provided by more than one person.(2) The requirement outlined in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:(a) Rural hospitals certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as independent sole community hospitals or critical access hospitals;(b) Hospitals located on an island operating within a public hospital district in Skagit county; and(c) Hospitals that are not currently designated as a critical access hospital, do not meet current federal eligibility requirements for designation as a critical access hospital, have combined medicaid and medicare inpatient days greater than 60 percent of all hospital inpatient days, and are located on the land of a federally recognized Indian tribe.(3) On or before January 1, 2027, hospitals that are exempt under subsection (2) of this section must provide patients with access to a patient advocate, which may be provided as contact information for a patient advocacy service, including a telephone or videoconference number. The hospital must verify those services are active and familiar with Washington health systems. The hospital must also share with the patient how to provide the patient advocate access to any necessary information including, but not limited to, medical records of the patient.(4) People with patient advocate duties must assist patients within the acute care hospital by supporting the patient as the patient is navigating the health care system. The patient advocate may provide patients with assistance with the following services that include, but are not limited to:(a) Accessing and obtaining their medical records;(b) Scheduling appointments and follow-up treatment plans and treatment visits;(c) Collaborating with the health care team of the patients to provide the patients with better understanding of their medical condition, treatment options, and other care-related questions; and(d) Representing the interest of the patients by asking questions, writing down information, and supporting patients with their communication with health care providers, insurance companies, and hospitals.--- END ---